ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/fr_CA/hyph_fr_CA.dic
l’a2
l’ar1r
l’éten4
l’é2
l’englou1ti3
l’e2
l’en1
l’en1g
l’en1glo
l’en2vi
l’en1v
î1na
î1n2o
î1ner
î1nez
î1neu
î1nem
î1nè
î1nâ
î1tra
ît2r
î1tro
î1tri
î3tress
î2tres
î1chi
2m.
1ma
3ma.
ma1rè
ma1na
ma1n2o
ma2ti.
ma1ti
ma1do
ma1z
ma1len
ma1me
ma1chi
ma1gi
ma1q
ma1j
1mr
1mo
mo1ren
mon1n
m2on
mo1d
mol3s
m2ol
mo1le
mo1me
mo1q
mo2quen
m1na
m1n2o
m1n2i
m1né
m4né.
m1ner
m1nez
m1ney
m1ba
m1bra
m1bro
m1bri
m1bré
m1breu
m1brè
m1bo
m1bé
m1bè
m1bê
1mi
mi1n2o
mi1né
mi1t2r
mit1t
mit1c
miè1v
mi2lie.
mi1li
mi1m
mi1ch
mi1g
m1se
m1tes
1mé
mé1t
mé1l
mé1m
mé1c
mé1g
mé1p
2me.
1mea
1me1ro
1me1re
mer3gen
1me1n2i
1ment
1mei
3mess
1me2st
1met
1me1d
1mez
1mem
1mec
1me1ç
m2d
mè2r
1mèt
3mèd
1mu
mu1n
2munien
mun2i
mu1g
1mî
mmi1n
m1mi
m1mer
m1men
m1meu
m1my
m1p
mp1se
m2ps
mp2ten
m2p1t
m2pent
mplo3ren
m1plo
m2plen
1mâ
m1f
1mê
1mô
m’ai1m
m’a2
m’ado1
m’amè1
m’accor3
m’a2c1c
m’aver4
m’appor3
m’ap3p
m’écou3
m’é2
m’épar3
1ca
ca1re
ca1na
ca1n2o
ca1ba
cat1c
ca1th
cau1c
c2au
ca1ler
ca1len
ca1ch
ca1v
ca1pa
ca1pr
ca1po
ca1pé
ca1q
cri4s
cri1q
1cré.
1cré2e
2c2re.
1crer
2cren
2cres
1coo
c2on2
1conn
cou3ve
cou1v
co1me
co1co
1co1v
co1pi
co1pé
1ci
ci1né
3ci1si
ci1t2r
ci1do
3ci1li
c1t
c2tre
ct2r
c2t2o.
c1to
c2ten
c2tes
1cé
cé1l
cé1m
cé1v
cé2p
2ce.
1cea
1cer
1ce1na
1ce1n2i
1ce1né
1cei
cei1g
2ce2s.
1cess
cessan3te
ces1s2a
1ce2st
1cet
1cez
1ceu
1ce1lé
1cem
cem2b
cep4ten
ce2p1t
c1d
1cè
1cu
2cub
cul2
2cul.
2culs
cul3q
cu1m
clo1c
1clé
2c2le.
1cler
1clet
1clez
1clè
1clâ
1cly
1cî
c1m
2c1c
ccrois3
cci1d
c1ci
3cha.
1ch2as
1chr
ch1oo
1ch2on
1choi
2chi.
1chio
1chis
1chit
2chie.
1chies
1chiez
1chid
chi2l
1chi2m
1chiv
1chip
1ché
2che.
1cher
2chen
1chess
1che2st
1chett
1chez
1cheu
1chem
1chep
1chef
1chu
1châ
1chy
2cp
c1qu
c2ques
c1f
1cy
cy1p
1cê
1cû
c1ki
c1kh2
1cœ
c’é3
ha1ren
ha1na
ha1n2o
ha1né
ha1br
ha1bo
ha1be
ha1do
haî1né
ha1me
ha1h
ha1g2r
ha1va
ha1ve
ha1po
h1re
hor1tè1
hon1f
h2on
ho1t2r
ho1co
ho2cl
h1n2o
h1n2i
h2n3s
hia1l
hi2na.
hi1na
hi2ne
hin1g
hi1th
hi2m
hi3me
hi2ca
hi2co
hi2pé
hs1
h1s2m
hé1b
hé1t
hé1l
hé1m
hé1c
1h2d
hu1c
hu1g
2hl
h1le
h1lè
h1h
h2v
hy1pe
hô1t
hô1m
h1k
2g.
1ga.
ga1rè1
1gan
ga1na
ga1n2o
1gab
ga1br
ga1bo
1gai
1g2as
ga1do
ga1dj
1ga1z
ga1ler
1gag
ga1gè1
ga1v
ga1p
g2r
1gro
1greu
1grem
1go
go1nes
g2on
go1s2p
g2os
go1th
go2gu
go1g
g2n
1gna
1gn2on
gn2o
1gnoi
1gnot
3gn2i
3gné
2g2ne.
3gner
2gnen
2gnes
1gnez
1gneu
1gnem
1gnè
1gnâ
1gny
g1b
gby1
1gi.
1gia
1gio
1gin
gi1n2o
gi1né
1gié
1gie
1gic
gi1vo
1giq
2gs
2gt
g1te
1gé
gé1l
gé1m
gé1v
2ge.
1gea
1ger
1geo
1gen1ta
1gen1ti
1gen3té
1gen1v
1gess
1ge2st
1get
ge2d
1gez
1geu
1gel
1gem
1geâ
1gey
g1d
1gè
1gua
1gur
gu1n
1gui
1gus
1gué
2gue.
1guer
3gues
1guett
3gueu
1guè
1gu1l
1guy
1gla
1glo
gli3gen
1glé
1gler
2glen
1glet
1glem
1glè1
2g1m
gmen3ten
g1ment
g1c
1ghi
2g1g
1gâ
1gj
gê1
g1k
1gw
2v.
va1ren
va1n2o
vanouis3
va1do
va1ler
vam1
1vag
va1gu
va1p
1vra.
1vr2as
1vr2on
2v2re.
3vre1ra
2vren
2vres
3vret
3vrez
3vreu
1vref
1v2os
vou1d
vo2len
v2ol
1vi
vi1né
vi1t2r
vi3da
vi1den
3vil
vi1m
vi1gn2o
vig2n
vi1vra
vi1vo
v1s
1vé
vé1l
2ve.
1ve2r.
1ve1ra
1ve1ro
2ven2t.
3ve2st
1vet
1vem2
1ve1g
1vu
1vâ
vê1t2r
2p.
1pa.
pa1rè
par1q
pa1na
pa1n2o
pai1sè1
1p2as
pat2
pa1ten
1pad
1pal
pa1ler
1pag
pa1po
pa1ph
pa1q
pa1j
1pay
prou1vè3
prou1v
pro1p
2p2re.
pon1n
p2on
po1ne
pos1s
p2os
po1ten
po1th
po1d
pour1
po3g
po1p
p1n2o
1pia
1pio
pi1n2o
1pié
1pie
pi1do
pi1m
pi1ch
pi1g
pi1p
2ps
p3sh
2p1t
p2tes
1pé.
1pés
pé1t
1péd
pé1l
pé1c
pé1p
2pe.
1pea
1pe2r.
pen4san
pe2ns
pen1s2a
1pend
1pen1h
2pes
3pe2st
3pe1sé
1pet
1pez
1peu
1pel
1pem
1pè
pè1l
pu1n
pu1b
1plo
1pli
1plé
2p2le.
1pler
2ples
3pless
1plez
3plem
1pha
1phi
1phé
2phe.
2phen
1phy
p1p
ppa1re
p2pent
p2peu
ppli1què3
p1pli
1pâ
2pf
py1
1pê
â1tra
ât2r
â1tri
âton1n
â1to
ât2on
â1li
â1ler
â1leu
â1mer
â1cha
â1cho
â1chi
â1chet
â1chè
â2g
ï1ra
ï1ro
ï1l
ïlan2
ï1g
ï1f
ï1k
2q.
1qua
1quo
1qui.
1quio
1qué
2que.
1quer
1que1na
1quet
1quez
1queu
1quel
1quem
1quef
1què
1quâ
1qu’
1qû
2f.
1fa
fa1na
fa1n2o
fan3tes
fa1né
fa1br
fa1m
fa1ch
fa1v
1fra
froy1
2f2re.
2fren
2fres
fo1re
fou1c
fo1m
fo1q
1fi
fi1né
fis1q
3fil
3fic
fi1cel
fi1g
2fs
f1t
fé1b
fé1l
fé1c
2fe.
fer3v
1feu
2feux
1fu
fu1ne
fui1re
ful1
1fla
1flo
flo1q
1flé
2f2le.
1fler
2fles
1flem
3flex
f1c
1fâ
f1f
ffor1cè3
f2fes
1ja
ja1b
ja1v
ja1p
jon1g
j2on
jo1c
1je
j1d
juriè1
ju1ri
ju1t
ju1m
j’ai2
j’a2
1xa1le
xa1m
xi1gen
x1t2r
x1ten
xé1c
x1m
x1c
xcel3len
x1h
x1p
x1q
ya1na
1yam1
y1r
y2re
yon1na
y2on
yo1p
y1na
y1n2o
y1n2i
yn1t
y1né
y1ner
y1b
y1thi
yé1m
yer2
y1la
y1lo
y1li
y1lé
y1lu
y1c
y1gi
y1gl
y1va1
ypri1
y1po1
y1pi
y2f
ê1na
ê2nes
ê1tri
êt2r
ê1tem
ê1la
ê1li
ê1lé
ê1ler
ê1lè
ê1cha
ê1cho
ê1chè
ê1va
ê1ver
ê1vez
ê1veu
1ç
û1ri
û1ret
û1rem
û1na
û1né
û1ner
û1nez
û1nè
û1nâ
û1tem
û1la
û1lo
û1lé
û1ler
û1lez
ô1na
ô1né
ô1ner
ô1la
ô1lé
ô1ler
ô1leu
ô1lem
ô1p
1ka
ka1r
ka1bo
ka1d
1ko
ko2p
ks1l
1ké
ké1l
1ker
ker3m
1kel
1key
k1m
kh2
k1g
k1p
1ky
k1k
war3
1wa2n.
wa1na
w2as1
wat3
wit1
wil1
ws1
wer1
wy1
'a2
'o2
'i2
'é2
'en1
ü2r1s
ün1
üs1
ül1
’a2
’arriv2as3
’ar1r
’arri1va
’arrê3ten
’arrê1tè3
’ar1ti1
’ar1d
’ar2mé
’ar1m
’ar3me
’ar1g
’anar3
’an2n
’an1na1
’annon3cen
’ann2o
’ann2on
’anno2nc
’an3ges
’abandonnè3
’aban1do
’aband2on
’abatti3r
’abat1t
’abat1ti
’abeil3
’ail3len
’assassi3ne
’2as
’as1s2a
’ass2as
’assas1si
’as1sem3
’assem1blè3
’assem1b
’at1tri4
’at1t
’att2r
’atti3ren
’at1ti
’atti1rè3
’atten3de
’adres3sen
’ado3ren
’ado1rè3
’au2th
’2au
’allian3ces
’al1li
’allia2nc
’aî1
’am2as1
’a1ma
’ame1nè3
’accor1dè3
’a2c1c
’accepta3b
’acce2p1t
’accep1ta
’accep1tè3
’accu3s
’ac1cu
’accu1sè3
’acquit3
’ac1qu
’agri2
’ag2r
’avanta3ges
’avan1ta
’avè3ren
’ap3p
’appro3chen
’appe1lè3
’ap1pel
’appel3len
’appe1lâ3
’appli3quen
’ap1pli
’affli3g
’af1f
’ajou1
’o2
’ordonnè3
’or1do
’ord2on
’obser3ven
’ob1se
’ob1ser
’obser1v
’obtin3r
’ob1t
’ob1ti
’obéis3
’o2s1t
’2os
’o1sè1
’ouvri3re
’ou1v
’oppo3sen
’op1p
’opp2os
’i2
’in2n
’instal3len
’in2s1t
’i2ns
’ins1ta
’instal1lè3
’insul1tè3
’in1su
’inscri3v
’ins1c
’in1t
’in1di1
’i2n1c
’in2c2on2
’in1co
’incli3
’in1cl
’invo1
’in1v
’ima1gi3
’i1ma
’ima3ges
’im2m
’im2pie
’im1p
’é2
’éner2
’é1n
’ét2on4
’é1to
’étonnan3
’éten3de
’élevè3
’éle1v
’élè3ven
’écritu3res
’écri1tu
’écou3ten
’écou1tè3
’éga3re
’éveil3len
’évê3ques
’épreu3ves
’épui1
’e2
’en1
’en2n
’ensei1gnè3
’e2ns
’en3seig
’enseig2n
’entr2as3
’en1tra
’ent2r
’en3tren
’en3tres
’entendi3r
’en1tend
’enten1di
’enten3den
’enten1dî3
’endurci3re
’en1du
’endur1ci
’endurcis3
’en2c2on2
’e2nc
’en1co
’encom3
’envoyè3
’en1v
’envelop3
’enve1lo
’esti1mè3
’e2st
’es1ti
’eu1r
’eus3sen
’el3les
’em1bar3
’em1b
’em1ba
’em2m
’emme1nè3
’em1men
’empa3ren
’em1p
’empa1rè3
’empor3ten
’empê1chè3
’em1pê
’exci1tè3
’ex1c
’ex1ci
’eû1m
’u2
’ur1
’uni3re
’un2i
’unis1
’u1ti1
’utili3sen
’uti1li
’utili1sè3
’histoi3res
’hi2st
’his1to
’hum3b
’ô2
än1
öl1
á1
